New York, session 2025-2026, A10237.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 209-w of the general municipal 2 law, as amended by section 10 of part A of chapter 101 of the laws of 3 2013, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special, or local 5 law or charter to the contrary, no person shall, after the effective 6 date of regulations adopted by the state fire administrator pursuant to 7 section one hundred fifty-eight of the executive law, receive an 8 original appointment on a permanent basis as a fire fighter of any coun- 9 ty, city, town, village, or fire district unless such person has previ- 10 ously been awarded a certificate by the state fire administrator attest- 11 ing to [his or her] such person's satisfactory completion of an approved 12 fire basic training program and an approved battery storage fire train- 13 ing program; and every person who is appointed on a temporary basis or 14 for a probationary term or on other than a permanent basis as a fire 15 fighter of any county, city, town, village or fire district shall 16 forfeit [his or her] such person's position as such unless [he or she] 17 such person previously has satisfactorily completed, or within the time 18 prescribed by regulations promulgated by the state fire administrator 19 pursuant to section one hundred fifty-eight of the executive law, satis- 20 factorily completes, a fire basic training program and an approved 21 battery storage fire training program for temporary or probationary fire 22 fighters and is awarded a certificate by the state fire administrator 23 attesting thereto. 24 § 2. Section 158 of the executive law, as added by section 28 of part 25 B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 26 § 158. Firefighting training. 1. For the purpose of this section, the 27 term fire fighter shall mean a member of a fire department whose duties EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11738-01-5 A. 10237 2 1 include fire service as defined in paragraph d of subdivision eleven of 2 section three hundred two of the retirement and social security law. 3 2. In addition to the functions, powers and duties otherwise provided 4 by this article, the state fire administrator may promulgate rules and 5 regulations with respect to: 6 (a) The approval, or revocation thereof, of fire training programs and 7 battery storage fire training programs for fire fighters; 8 (b) Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements, and equipment 9 and facilities to be required for approved fire training programs and 10 battery storage fire training programs for fire fighters; 11 (c) Minimum qualifications for instructors for approved fire training 12 programs and battery storage fire training programs for fire fighters; 13 (d) The requirements of minimum basic training which fire fighters 14 appointed to probationary terms shall complete before being eligible for 15 permanent appointment, and the time within which such basic training 16 must be completed following such appointment to a probationary term; 17 (e) The requirements of minimum basic training which fire fighters not 18 appointed for probationary terms but appointed on other than a permanent 19 basis shall complete in order to be eligible for continued employment or 20 permanent appointment, and the time within which such basic training 21 must be completed following such appointment on a non-permanent basis; 22 (f) The requirements for in-service training programs designed to 23 assist fire fighters in maintaining skills and being informed of techno- 24 logical advances; 25 (g) Categories or classifications of advanced in-service training 26 programs and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements with 27 respect to such categories or classifications; 28 (h) Exemptions from particular provisions of this article in the case 29 of any county, city, town, village or fire district, if in the opinion 30 of the state fire administrator the standards of fire training estab- 31 lished and maintained by such county, city, town, village or fire 32 district are equal to or higher than those established pursuant to this 33 article; or revocation in whole or in part of such exemption, if in [his 34 or her] such state fire administrator's opinion the standards of fire 35 training established and maintained by such county, city, town, village 36 or fire district are lower than those established pursuant to this arti- 37 cle; and 38 (i) Education, health and physical fitness requirements for eligibil- 39 ity of persons for provisional or permanent appointment in the compet- 40 itive class of the civil service as fire fighters as it deems necessary 41 and proper for the efficient performance of such duties; 42 3. In furtherance of [his or her] the state fire administrator's func- 43 tions, powers and duties as set forth in this section, [the] such 44 state fire administrator may: 45 (a) Recommend studies, surveys and reports to be made by the state 46 fire administrator regarding the carrying out of the objectives and 47 purposes of this section; 48 (b) Visit and inspect any fire training programs approved by the state 49 fire administrator or for which application for such approval has been 50 made; and 51 (c) Recommend standards for promotion to supervisory positions. 52 4. In addition to the functions, powers and duties otherwise provided 53 by this section, the state fire administrator shall: 54 (a) Approve fire training programs and battery storage fire training 55 programs for fire fighters and issue certificates of approval to such 56 programs, and revoke such approval or certificate; A. 10237 3 1 (b) Certify, as qualified, instructors for approved fire training 2 programs and battery storage fire training programs for fire fighters 3 and issue appropriate certificates to such instructors; 4 (c) Certify fire fighters who have satisfactorily completed basic 5 training programs and in-service training programs, and issue appropri- 6 ate certificates to such fire fighters and revoke such certificates; 7 (d) Cause studies and surveys to be made relating to the establish- 8 ment, operation, effectiveness and approval of fire training and battery 9 storage fire training programs; 10 (e) Cause studies and surveys to be made relating to the completion or 11 partial completion of training programs by video or computer to the 12 maximum extent practicable; and 13 (f) Consult with and cooperate with the state university of New York 14 and private universities, colleges and institutes in the state for the 15 development of specialized courses of study for fire fighters in fire 16 science and fire administration. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 18 it shall have become a law.